Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4506
Law enforcement officer; failure to comply with electronic recordation requirement; admissibility of evidence.

If a law enforcement officer fails to comply with section 29-4503, such failure shall not bar the use of any evidence derived from such statement if the court determines that the evidence is otherwise admissible.

Laws 2008, LB179, § 6.